Mississippi, session 2026, HB1251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-15-563, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-563.  (1)  Each person who appears to vote in person at a polling place or the registrar's office shall be required to identify himself or herself to a poll manager or the registrar by presenting current and valid photo identification before such person shall be allowed to vote. (2)  The identification required by subsection (1) of this section shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (a)  A valid Mississippi driver's license, no other state's driver's license shall be accepted; (b)  A valid identification card issued by a branch, department, agency or entity of the State of Mississippi; (c)  A valid United States passport; (d)  A valid employee identification card containing a photograph of the elector and issued by any branch, department, agency or entity of the United States government, the State of Mississippi, or any county, municipality, board, authority or other entity of this state; (e)  A current and valid Mississippi license to carry a pistol or revolver; (f)  A valid tribal identification card containing a photograph of the elector; (g)  A valid United States military identification card; (h)  A current and valid student identification card, containing a photograph of the elector, issued by any accredited college, university or community or junior college in the State of Mississippi; and (i)  An official Mississippi voter identification card containing a photograph of the elector. (3)  For purposes of this section valid shall mean an official government document that establishes the voter's identity and has no expiration date or has an issuance date not more than ten (10) years prior to the date the document is presented. (4)  (a)  A person who appears to vote in person at a polling place and does not have identification as required by this section may vote by affidavit ballot.  The affidavit ballot shall then be counted if the person shall present acceptable photo identification to the registrar within five (5) days. (b)  An elector who has a religious objection to being photographed may vote by affidavit ballot, and the elector, within five (5) days after the election, shall execute an affidavit in the registrar's office affirming that the exemption applies. (5)  The intentional failure of an election official to require a voter to present identification as required by this section shall be considered corrupt conduct under Section 97-13-19 and shall be reported to the Secretary of State and the Attorney General. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.